Hawaii statutes.
[§6E-39] Jurisdiction over World War II
memorial. The jurisdiction and control of the World War II memorial,
located in the front of the state office building in Honolulu, is vested in the
state department of accounting and general services. [L 1976, c 104, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next